Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4939.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 17d. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 752 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 752.802 Property H Manufacture or sale of slugs for use in vending machines 5 752.811 Property H Breaking and entering a coin operated device 3 752.861 Person G Careless discharge of firearm causing injury or death 2 752.881 Person G Reckless use of bow and arrow resulting in injury or death 2 752.1003 Property F False claim, statement, or representation to obtain health care benefits 4 752.1004 Property F Soliciting, paying, or receiving kickback or receiving referral fee for health care payment 4 752.1005 Property H Conspiring to commit health care fraud 10 752.1006 Property D Health care fraud ? subsequent offense 20 752.1054(2) Property G Copying audio or video recordings for gain 5 752.1073(1) Pub ord B Distribution of prohibited material 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 752.1073(2) Pub ord B Aggravated distribution of prohibited material 25 752.1084 Property E Organized retail crime act violation 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4938 (request no. H01567'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.